zh-CN: 水源: 自流井水; 深井水; 淡化海水; 冰川水; 矿泉水; 市政纯净水; 雨水; 泉水; 井水; 其他
de: Wasserquelle: Artesisch; Tiefbrunnen; Entsalztes Meerwasser; Gletscher; Mineralquelle; Kommunal gereinigt; Regenwasser; Quelle; Brunnen; Sonstige
sl-SI: Vir vode: Arteška; Globoki vodnjak; Razsoljena morska voda; Leniška; Mineralni vrelec; Občinska prečiščena; Deževnica; Izvir; Vodnjak; Drugo
pt-BR: Fonte de água: Artesiano; Poço profundo; Água do mar dessalinizada; Glacial; Fonte mineral; Rede pública purificada; Água da chuva; Nascente; Poço; Outros
ro-RO: Sursă de apă: Arteziană; Puț de adâncime; Apă de mare desalinizată; Glaciară; Izvor mineral; Purificată municipală; Apă de ploaie; Izvor; Fântână; Altele
el: Πηγή νερού: Αρτεσιανό; Βαθύ πηγάδι; Αφαλατωμένο θαλασσινό νερό; Παγετώνα; Μεταλλική πηγή; Δημοτικό φιλτραρισμένο; Βρόχινο νερό; Πηγή; Πηγάδι; Άλλο
es: Fuente de agua: Artesiana; Pozo profundo; Agua de mar desalinizada; Glaciar; Manantial mineral; Purificada municipal; Agua de lluvia; Manantial; Pozo; Otro
fi: Veden lähde: Arteesinen; Syväkaivo; Suolaton merivesi; Jäätikkö; Kivennäislähde; Kunnallisesti puhdistettu; Sadevesi; Lähde; Kaivo; Muu
tr: Su kaynağı: Artezyen; Derin kuyu; Tuzdan arındırılmış deniz suyu; Buzul; Maden suyu kaynağı; Şebekeden arıtılmış; Yağmur suyu; Kaynak; Kuyu; Diğer
en: Water source: Artesian; Deep well; Desalinated seawater; Glacial; Mineral spring; Municipal purified; Rainwater; Spring; Well; Other
bg-BG: Източник на вода: Артезианска; Дълбок кладенец; Обезсолена морска вода; Ледникова; Минерален извор; Пречистена чешмяна вода; Дъждовна вода; Изворна вода; Кладенец; Други
cs: Zdroj vody: Artéská; Z hluboké studny; Odsolená mořská voda; Ledovcová; Minerální pramen; Vyčištěná z vodovodu; Dešťová; Pramen; Studniční; Jiný
zh-TW: 水源: 自流井水; 深井水; 淡化海水; 冰川水; 礦泉水; 市政純淨水; 雨水; 泉水; 井水; 其他
sk-SK: Zdroj vody: Artézska; Hlbinná studňa; Odsolená morská voda; Ľadovcová; Minerálny prameň; Vyčistená z obecného vodovodu; Dažďová voda; Prameň; Studňa; Iné
hr-HR: Izvor vode: Arteška; Duboki bunar; Desalinizirana morska voda; Ledenjačka; Mineralni izvor; Gradska pročišćena voda; Kišnica; Izvorska; Bunarska; Ostalo
pl: Źródło wody: Artezyjskie; Głębinowe; Odsolona woda morska; Z lodowca; Źródło mineralne; Oczyszczona woda miejska; Woda deszczowa; Źródlana; Studzienna; Inne
vi: Nguồn nước: Giếng phun; Giếng khoan sâu; Nước biển khử muối; Nước sông băng; Suối khoáng; Nước máy tinh khiết; Nước mưa; Nước suối; Nước giếng; Khác
nb: Vannkilde: Artesisk; Dyp brønn; Avsaltet sjøvann; Isbre; Mineralkilde; Kommunalt renset; Regnvann; Kildevann; Brønn; Annet
nl: Waterbron: Artesisch; Diepe put; Ontzilt zeewater; Gletsjer; Mineraalbron; Gemeentelijk gezuiverd; Regenwater; Bron; Put; Overige
sv: Vattenkälla: Artesisk; Djupborrad brunn; Avsaltat havsvatten; Glaciärvatten; Mineralkälla; Renat kommunalt vatten; Regnvatten; Källvatten; Brunn; Övrigt
da: Vandkilde: Artesisk; Dyb brønd; Afsaltet havvand; Gletsjervand; Mineralkilde; Kommunalt renset; Regnvand; Kilde; Brønd; Andet
lt-LT: Vandens šaltinis: Artezinis vanduo; Giluminio gręžinio vanduo; Gėlintas jūros vanduo; Ledynų vanduo; Mineralinis šaltinis; Gryninamas vandentiekio vanduo; Lietaus vanduo; Šaltinio vanduo; Šulinio vanduo; Kita
ru: Источник воды: Артезианская; Из глубокой скважины; Опресненная морская вода; Ледниковая; Из минерального источника; Муниципальная очищенная; Дождевая; Родниковая; Колодезная; Другое
fr: Source d'eau: Artésien; Puits profond; Eau de mer dessalée; Glaciaire; Source minérale; Purifiée municipale; Eau de pluie; Source; Puits; Autre
ko: 급수원: 지하수; 심정수; 담수화 해수; 빙하수; 광천수; 시립 정수; 빗물; 용천수; 우물수; 기타
it: Fonte dell'acqua: Artesiana; Pozzo profondo; Acqua di mare desalinizzata; Glaciale; Sorgente minerale; Purificata di rete; Acqua piovana; Sorgente; Pozzo; Altro
pt-PT: Origem da água: Artesiana; Poço fundo; Água do mar dessalinizada; Glaciar; Nascente mineral; Municipal purificada; Água da chuva; Nascente; Poço; Outro
hu: Vízforrás: Artézi; Mélykút; Sótalanított tengervíz; Gleccser; Ásványvízforrás; Tisztított vezetékes víz; Esővíz; Forrásvíz; Kútvíz; Egyéb
th: แหล่งน้ำ: น้ำบาดาล; บ่อน้ำลึก; น้ำทะเลที่ผ่านการแยกเกลือ; ธารน้ำแข็ง; น้ำพุแร่; น้ำประปาบริสุทธิ์; น้ำฝน; น้ำพุ; บ่อน้ำ; อื่นๆ
ja: 水源: 自噴水; 深井戸; 脱塩海水; 氷河水; 鉱泉; 市営浄水; 雨水; 湧水; 井戸水; その他